Hawaii statutes.
[§324-6]
Maternal death review reports. (a) The director of health shall submit an
annual written report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session on the status of reviews of maternal deaths
conducted by the department. The annual report shall cover the calendar
year immediately prior to the year in which the report is due and shall
describe the total number of deaths of women while pregnant or within one year
after a pregnancy in Hawaii, the causes of those deaths and whether the causes
of death were pregnancy related, any maternal mortality review activities
conducted by the department, trends in maternal deaths, and recommendations for
system changes, including any proposed legislation.

(b) The director of health shall submit a copy
of any other maternal death review report published by the department of
health, detailing findings and recommendations resulting from such a review, to
the legislature upon the report's publication. [L 2016, c 203, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next